Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-180.03
Minor; sale or gift to; misrepresenting age; parent or guardian; duties.

No parent or guardian shall knowingly suffer or permit any minor, of whom he or she may be a parent or guardian, to violate the provisions of section 53-180.01 or 53-180.02.

Laws 1951, c. 174, § 1(4), p. 664;

Laws 1961, c. 258, § 6, p. 765.